Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 341.522, as amended by section 1, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2016,  is amended
to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of  Student Access and Completion shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections [ (5) and (6) ] (6) to (9)  of  this section, the office shall provide a [ waiver
of tuition ] grant  for community  college courses to a person who meets the criteria described in
subsections (3) [ and (4)] to (5)  of this section. The [ waiver] grant  shall be [ a grant  and] limited as
provided by subsections [ (5) and (6) ] (6) to (9)  of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state; and
(B) Determined by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan  to transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
(ii) An associate degree; or
(iii) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Has been a resident of this state for at least 12 months prior to  enrolling in the courses
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the person’s highest level of education in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a General Educational  Development (GED) certificate as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(d) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this  section,  attained the person’s highest level
of education as described in  paragraph (c) of this subsection within six months from the date that
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 1
the person first enrolls in courses described in paragraph (a)  of this subsection for the purpose of
receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade  point average of 2.5 or better in high school or otherwise dem-
onstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules  adopted by
the commission;
(f) Completed and submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each  academic
year and accepted all state and federal aid  grants available to the person, if eligible to file the ap-
plication; and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
(A) More than a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution  of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded a grant
under subsection (3) of this section, but the person enters into  service with a career and
technical student organization relating to agriculture or farming that  is approved by the
Department of Education under ORS 344.077  within six months after the person attained the
person’s highest level of education as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the per-
son will continue to be eligible  to receive the grant if the person first enrolls in courses de-
scribed in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months of finishing the person’s  service
with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to  the situation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the com-
mission may waive the  requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person
who shows that the person was unable to timely enroll in courses described  in subsection
(3)(a) of this section due to  a significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to im-
plement this paragraph.
[(4)(a)] (5)(a) A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the
person, in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of this  section, meets the
following criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by  the commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory  academic progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal aid  grant
requirements;
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a  half-time student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year; and
(D) Completes a first-year experience, as identified by the community college and  reported by
the community college to the commission.
(b) A person who fails to meet an eligibility  requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant under  this section for the term after which the
person fails to meet  the eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a) The total amount of a grant awarded under this section  shall be based on each
term that a person is enrolled in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section.  Except as
provided in subsections (8) and (9) of this section,  after the amount of  tuition for the person for
the term is [ reduced by $50, to be paid by the person, and ] reduced by  any amounts received by the
person in state and federal aid grants, the person shall be eligible for a grant under this section in
an amount that equals:
(A) Except as provided by [ paragraph] paragraphs (b)  and (c)  of this subsection, not less than
the greater of:
(i) $1,000; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 2
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a  community college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b) The amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection,  shall be
reduced by $50 for each term that the person receives a grant under this section.
[(b)] (c) The minimum amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph (a) of this  subsection,
may be prorated for a person who is enrolled in courses  described in subsection (3)(a) of this section
for a sufficient number of credit hours to be considered at least a half-time student but not  a full-
time student.
[(c)] (d)  The commission may prescribe by rule whether to  include fees, and any limitations re-
lated to the inclusion of fees, when determining  the actual cost of tuition or the average cost of
tuition under this subsection.
[(6)] (7) [ The total amount in grants awarded under this section by  the office may not exceed $10
million per  fiscal year, or any lesser amount available to the office for the purpose of this section. ] The
commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded, which may  allow for
preference to be given to persons enrolled in school districts or high  schools that meet specified
criteria.
(8) Prior to the start of the fall term of each academic  year, the commission shall de-
termine whether there  are sufficient moneys to award a grant under this section to each
person who meets the criteria described in subsections (3) to (5) of this section. On the  basis
of this determination the commission may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant  under this section to a person whose family con-
tribution, as determined by  the commission by rule, is at or below the level the commission
determines is necessary to allow the commission to operate  the Oregon Promise program
with available moneys; or
(b) Reduce or eliminate  any limitation on eligibility previously imposed by the commis-
sion under paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(9)(a) If at any time the commission determines that there are  insufficient moneys to
provide a grant to  each person who has been awarded a grant under this section, the com-
mission may:
(A) Decrease the total amount of the grant awarded; or
(B) Increase the amount that a person must pay under  subsection (6)(b) of this section
for each term that the person receives a grant under this section.
(b) If at  any time the commission determines that the amount of moneys available to
operate the Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount determined  under subsection (8)
of this section, the commission may reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility to re-
ceive a grant under this section  that was previously imposed by the commission under sub-
section (8)(a) of this section.
(c) The commission shall  promptly notify the interim committees of the Legislative As-
sembly responsible for higher education each  time the commission takes any action under
paragraph (a) or (b) of this subsection.
[(7)] (10) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration of this  section,
including any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a  grant under this sec-
tion;
(b) Determining whether a person is  eligible for a grant under this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection [ (6)] (7) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or policies that improve  the academic success or completion rates
for persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing  eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 3
(e) Evaluating the impact of the program established under this section, including  any require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
[(8)] (11) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission shall submit
to an interim legislative committee related to education a report  that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection  (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
(b) The amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program on  school districts that had students receive a grant
under this section;
(d) The financial  impact and the enrollment impact of the program on community colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
SECTION 2.
If House Bill 3423 becomes law, sections 1  (amending ORS 341.522) and 2,
chapter 410, Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 3423),  are repealed and ORS 341.522, as
amended by section 1, chapter 75, Oregon Laws 2016, and section 1 of this 2017  Act, is
amended to read:
341.522. (1) The Office of  Student Access and Completion shall administer the Oregon Promise
program as provided by this section.
(2) Subject to subsections [ (6) to (9) ] (7) to (10)  of this section, the office shall provide a grant
for community college courses to a person who meets the  criteria described in subsections (3) to
[(5)] (6) of this section. The grant shall be limited as provided by  subsections [ (6) to (9) ] (7) to (10)
of this section.
(3) A grant shall be awarded under this section to a person who meets the following criteria:
(a) Is enrolled in courses that are:
(A) Offered at a community college in this state; and
(B) Determined by the office, in accordance with rules adopted by the Higher Education Coor-
dinating Commission, to be required for completion of:
(i) A one-year curriculum for students who plan  to transfer to another post-secondary institution
of education;
(ii) An associate degree; or
(iii) A program in career and technical education;
(b) Has been a resident  of this state for at least 12 months prior to enrolling in the courses
described in paragraph (a) of this subsection;
(c) Attained the person’s highest level of education in this state prior to:
(A) Receiving a diploma under ORS 329.451;
(B) Receiving a General Educational  Development (GED) certificate as provided by ORS 350.175;
(C) Completing grade 12 in compliance with the requirements of ORS 339.035; or
(D) Completing grade 12 at a private or parochial school, as described in ORS 339.030 (1)(a);
(d) Except as provided in [ subsection] subsections  (4)  and (5)  of  this section, attained the
person’s highest level of education  as described in paragraph (c) of this subsection within six months
from the date that the person first enrolls in courses described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection
for the purpose of receiving a grant under this section;
(e) Earned a cumulative grade  point average of 2.5 or better in high school or otherwise dem-
onstrated an equivalent academic ability, as determined by the office according to rules  adopted by
the commission;
(f) Completed and submitted the Free Application for Federal Student Aid for each  academic
year and accepted all state and federal aid  grants available to the person, if eligible to file the ap-
plication; and
(g) Has not completed either of the following:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 4
(A) More than a total of 90 credit hours, or the equivalent, at a post-secondary institution  of
education; or
(B) A curriculum, degree or program, as described in paragraph (a)(B) of this subsection.
(4)(a) If a  person otherwise meets the required criteria and has been awarded a grant under
subsection (3) of  this section, but the person enters into service with a career and technical student
organization relating to agriculture or farming that is approved by the  Department of Education
under ORS 344.077 within six months after the person attained  the person’s highest level of educa-
tion as described in subsection (3)(c) of this section, the person will continue to be eligible to receive
the grant if the person first enrolls in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section within
six months of finishing the person’s service with the career and technical student organization.
(b) In addition to the  situation described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the commission may
waive the requirement set forth in subsection (3)(d) of this section for a person who  shows that the
person was unable to timely enroll in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section due to
a significant hardship. The commission may adopt rules to implement this paragraph.
(5) A member of the  Oregon National Guard who has completed initial active duty
training is not required to comply with the criteria set forth in subsection  (3)(d) of this
section in order to receive a grant, provided that the member first  enrolls in courses de-
scribed in subsection (3)(a) of this section within six months  after completing initial active
duty training, as evidenced by an official form issued by the United States Department of
Defense.
[(5)(a)] (6)(a)  A person continues to remain eligible  to receive a grant under this section if the
person, in addition to satisfying the criteria specified in subsection (3) of this  section, meets the
following criteria:
(A) Maintains at least the minimum cumulative grade point average prescribed by  the commis-
sion based on federal aid grant requirements;
(B) Makes satisfactory  academic progress toward a curriculum, degree or program, as described
in subsection (3)(a)(B) of this section, as prescribed by the commission based on federal aid  grant
requirements;
(C) Enrolls in courses described in subsection (3)(a) of this  section for a sufficient number of
credit hours to be considered at least a  half-time student each term for at least three terms in each
consecutive academic year; and
(D) Completes a first-year experience, as identified by the community college and  reported by
the community college to the commission.
(b) A person who fails to meet an eligibility  requirement described in paragraph (a) of this
subsection becomes ineligible to receive a grant under  this section for the term after which the
person fails to meet  the eligibility requirement, unless the eligibility requirement is waived by the
office according to rules adopted by the commission.
[(6)(a)] (7)(a)  The total amount of a grant awarded under this section  shall be based on each
term that a person is enrolled in courses described  in subsection (3)(a) of this section. Except as
provided in subsections [ (8)] (9)  and [ (9)] (10)  of this section, after the amount of  tuition for the
person for the  term is reduced by any amounts received by the person in state and federal aid
grants, the person shall be eligible for a grant under this section in an amount that equals:
(A) Except  as provided by paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, not less than the greater
of:
(i) $1,000; and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(B) Not more than the lesser of:
(i) The average cost of tuition at a  community college in this state, as determined by the office;
and
(ii) The person’s actual cost for tuition.
(b) The amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph  (a) of this subsection, shall be reduced
by $50 for each term that the person receives a grant under this section.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 5
(c) The minimum  amount of a grant, as calculated under paragraph (a) of this subsection, may
be prorated for a person who is enrolled in courses described in  subsection (3)(a) of this section for
a sufficient number of credit hours to  be considered at least a half-time student but not a full-time
student.
(d) The commission may  prescribe by rule whether to include fees, and any limitations related
to the inclusion of fees, when determining the actual cost of tuition or the average cost  of tuition
under this subsection.
[(7)] (8)  The commission may adopt by rule the priority by which grants are awarded,  which
may allow for preference  to be given to persons enrolled in school districts or high schools that
meet specified criteria.
[(8)] (9) Prior to the start  of the fall term of each academic year, the commission shall determine
whether there are  sufficient moneys to award a grant under this section to each person who meets
the criteria described in subsections (3) to [ (5)] (6) of this  section. On the basis of this determination
the commission may:
(a) Limit eligibility to receive a grant under this section  to a person whose family contribution,
as determined by the commission by rule, is at  or below the level the commission determines is
necessary to allow the commission to operate the Oregon Promise program with available  moneys;
or
(b) Reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility  previously imposed by the commission under
paragraph (a) of this subsection.
[(9)(a)] (10)(a)  If at any time the commission determines that there are insufficient  moneys to
provide a grant to each person who has been  awarded a grant under this section, the commission
may:
(A) Decrease the total amount of the grant awarded; or
(B) Increase the amount that a person must pay under subsection  [ (6)(b)] (7)(b)  of this section
for each term that the person receives a grant under this section.
(b) If at any time the commission determines that the  amount of moneys available to operate the
Oregon Promise program exceeds the amount  determined under subsection [ (8)] (9)  of this section,
the commission may reduce or eliminate any limitation on eligibility to receive a  grant under this
section that was previously imposed by the commission under subsection  [ (8)(a)] (9)(a)  of this sec-
tion.
(c) The commission shall promptly notify the interim committees  of the Legislative Assembly
responsible for higher education each time the commission takes any action under paragraph (a)  or
(b) of this subsection.
[(10)] (11) The commission shall adopt any rules necessary for the administration  of this section,
including any requirements related to:
(a) Specifying the form and timelines for submitting an application for a  grant under this sec-
tion;
(b) Determining whether a person is  eligible for a grant under this section, including whether
the person shall be given priority as allowed under subsection [ (7)] (8) of this section;
(c) Implementing programs or policies that improve  the academic success or completion rates
for persons who receive a grant under this section;
(d) Prescribing  eligibility requirements and grant calculations for persons dually enrolled in a
community college and a public university; and
(e) Evaluating the impact of the program established under this section, including  any require-
ments for reporting data needed for evaluations.
[(11)] (12) No later than December 31 of each even-numbered year, the commission  shall submit
to an interim legislative committee related to education a report  that summarizes the commission’s
findings on the impact of the program established under this section. The report shall include:
(a) Student completion rates of curricula, degrees and programs described in subsection  (3)(a)(B)
of this section;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 6
(b) The amount of federal aid grants received by persons who received a grant under this sec-
tion;
(c) The financial impact of the program on school  districts that had students receive a grant
under this section;
(d) The financial impact and the enrollment impact of the program on community  colleges and
public universities in this state; and
(e) The overall success rate of the program and financial impact of the program.
SECTION 3.
The amendments to ORS 341.522 by section 2 of this  2017 Act first apply to
Oregon Promise program grants awarded for the 2018-2019 academic year.
SECTION 4. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 7, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1032 (SB 1032-B) Page 7